Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,101
Streets; grade; award of damages; when payable; appeal.

Whenever an award of damages for a change in grade or grading has been finally approved such damages may be assessed to the extent of the special benefits conferred by the improvement against the lots and parcels of land abutting upon or in the vicinity of the improvements made. Within sixty days after such assessment the award of damages shall become due and payable and must be paid by warrants drawn against a special fund created for such purpose. Any person feeling aggrieved by reason of an award of damages or failure to award sufficient damages may appeal to the district court of the county within which the property is located within the time and in the manner provided by law for such appeals.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 18, p. 202;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 107.
July 21, 2022